Indiana, session 2026, HB1068.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-11-2-14.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14.1. (a) Candidates for retention as a
member of the Indiana utility regulatory commission under
IC 8-1-1-2.1 shall be placed on the ballot:
(1) after the offices described in section 14 of this chapter;
(2) in a separate column on the ballot; and
(3) in alphabetical order according to surname.
(b) If the ballot includes one (1) or more candidates for
retention as a member of the Indiana utility regulatory
commission, the ballot must contain a statement that reads
substantially as follows: "To vote regarding whether to retain a
commissioner of the Indiana utility regulatory commission, you
must indicate a vote of either "yes" or "no" in response to the
question of the commissioner's retention. A straight party vote will
not count as a vote for or against retention of a commissioner.".
SECTION 2. IC 3-11-13-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) The ballot information, whether placed
on the ballot card or on the marking device, must be in the order of
arrangement provided for ballots under this section.
(b) Each county election board shall have the names of all
candidates for all elected offices, political party offices, and public
questions printed on a ballot card as provided in this chapter. The
county may:
(1) print all offices and questions on a single ballot card; and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot card must be of uniform size and of the same
quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners shall be listed on the ballot with the name and device set
forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the device
may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the device.
IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not include a
name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2) or more
parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space after the candidate's name
signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation with
a political party or that the candidate:
(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The offices and public questions on the general election ballot
must be placed on the ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e), and
IC 3-11-2-14.1(a). The offices and public questions may be listed in a
continuous column either vertically or horizontally and on a number of
separate pages.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for. A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1) candidate
is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the last
election is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state is
listed second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last election are
listed after the party listed in subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last election or a nominee is an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or
candidate is listed after the parties described in subdivisions (1),
(2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent" if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in a uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The following information must be placed at the top of the ballot
before the first public question is listed:
(1) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7.
(2) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8, IC 3-11-2-10(d),
and IC 3-11-2-10(e).
(l) The ballot must include a single connectable arrow, circle, oval,
or square, or a voting position for voting a straight party ticket by one
(1) mark as required by section 14 of this chapter, and the single
connectable arrow, circle, oval, or square, or the voting position for
casting a straight party ticket ballot must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


The name and device of each political party must be of uniform size
and type and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for
listing candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
party ticket, do not make a mark in this section and proceed to voting
the ballot by office.".
(m) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a single connectable
arrow, a circle, or an oval may be used instead of a square. Except as
expressly authorized or required by statute, a county election board
may not print a ballot card that contains language concerning the public
question other than the language authorized by a statute.
(n) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to optical scan ballots.
(o) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title or
contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
(p) This subsection applies to an optical scan ballot that does not
list:
(1) the names of political parties or candidates; or
(2) the text of public questions;
on the face of the ballot. The ballot must be prepared in accordance
with this section, except that the ballot must include a numbered circle
or oval to refer to each political party, candidate, or public question.
SECTION 3. IC 3-11-14-3.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.5. (a) Each county election board shall have
the names of all candidates for all elected offices, political party
offices, and public questions printed on ballot labels for use in an
electronic voting system as provided in this chapter.
(b) The county may:
(1) print all offices and public questions on a single ballot label;
and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot label is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot label must be of uniform size and of the same
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners must be listed on the ballot label with the name and device
set forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the
device may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the
device. IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not
include a name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2)
or more parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space after the candidate's name
signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation with
a political party or that the candidate:
(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The ballot labels must list the offices and public questions on the
general election ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e), and
IC 3-11-2-14.1(a). Each office and public question may have a
separate screen, or the offices and public questions may be listed in a
continuous column either vertically or horizontally.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for. A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1) candidate
is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the last
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


election is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state is
listed second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last election are
listed after the party listed in subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last election or a nominee is an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or
candidate is listed after the parties described in subdivisions (1),
(2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law. A space for
write-in voting for an office is not required if there are no
declared write-in candidates for that office. However, procedures
must be implemented to permit write-in voting for candidates for
federal offices.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent", if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the party order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7 must be
placed at the top or beginning of the ballot label before the first public
question is listed.
(l) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8, IC 3-11-2-10(d), and
IC 3-11-2-10(e) may be:
(1) placed on the ballot label; or
(2) posted in a location within the voting booth that permits the
voter to easily read the instructions.
(m) Except as provided in section 14.5 of this chapter, the ballot
label must include a touch sensitive point or button for voting a straight
political party ticket by one (1) touch, and the touch sensitive point or
button must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
The name and device of each party must be of uniform size and type,
and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for listing
candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
party ticket, press "NEXT" (or replace "NEXT" with the term used by
that voting system to permit a voter to skip a ballot screen) to continue
voting.".
(n) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a touch sensitive
point or button must be used instead of a square. Except as expressly
authorized or required by statute, a county election board may not print
a ballot label that contains language concerning the public question
other than the language authorized by a statute.
(o) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to ballots for electronic
voting systems.
(p) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot label does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title
or contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
SECTION 4. IC 8-1-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2018,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) There is created the Indiana utility
regulatory commission, which shall consist of five (5) members, at
least one (1) of whom shall be an attorney qualified to practice law
before the supreme court of Indiana and not more than three (3) of
whom belong to the same political party.
(b) The governor shall appoint members of the commission:
(1) for an initial term as a member; and all
(2) to fill any vacancies occurring on the commission;
shall be appointed by the governor from among persons nominated by
the nominating committee in accordance with IC 8-1-1.5.
(c) The members may be removed at any time by the governor for
cause.
(d) The governor shall appoint one (1) member as chairman.
(e) The members of the commission shall be appointed for a term of
four (4) years, except when a member is appointed to fill a vacancy, in
which case such appointment shall be for such unexpired term only. All
members of said commission shall serve as such until their successors
are duly appointed and qualified, and While so serving on the
commission, members of the commission shall devote full time to the
duties of the commission and shall not be actively engaged in any other
occupation, profession, or business that constitutes a conflict of interest
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


or otherwise interferes with carrying out their duties as commissioners.
(f) A member of the commission or any person appointed to any
position or employed in any capacity to serve the commission, may not
have any official or professional relationship or connection with, or
hold any stock or securities or have any pecuniary interest in any public
utility operating in Indiana.
(g) Each member appointed to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission shall take and subscribe to an oath in writing that the
member will faithfully perform the duties of the member's office, and
support and defend to the best of the member's ability the Constitution
and laws of the state of Indiana and of the United States of America,
and such oath shall be filed with the secretary of state.
(h) The chairman of the commission shall assign cases to the
various members of the commission or to administrative law judges for
hearings.
SECTION 5. IC 8-1-1-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2.1. (a) Except as provided in subsection
(b), the term of a member of the commission is four (4) years.
(b) The term of an individual who is appointed as a member of
the commission for the purpose of filling a vacant position in the
membership of the commission is the duration of the remainder of
the term of the member who vacated the position.
(c) An individual serving as a member of the commission may
serve a succeeding term as a member of the commission only if the
individual's retention for the succeeding term is approved by
voters at the general election that immediately precedes the
expiration of the term the individual is serving.
(d) An individual who is serving as a member of the commission
and wishes to serve a succeeding term as a member of the
commission must file a declaration with the secretary of state not
later than noon on the July 15 that immediately precedes the date
of the general election that immediately precedes the expiration of
the individual's term as a member of the commission. The
declaration must:
(1) state that the individual wishes to have the question of the
individual's retention as a member of the commission placed
on the ballot; and
(2) include a statement of the individual's name:
(A) as the individual wants the individual's name to appear
on the ballot; and
(B) as the individual's name is permitted to appear on the
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119


ballot under IC 3-5-7.
(e) If an individual serving as a member of the commission does
not file a declaration under subsection (d) stating that the
individual wishes to have the question of the individual's retention
as a member of the commission placed on the ballot, the
individual's position on the commission is vacant upon the
expiration of the individual's term.
(f) If an individual serving as a member of the commission files
a declaration under subsection (d) stating that the individual
wishes to have the question of the individual's retention as a
member of the commission placed on the ballot, the question of the
individual's retention shall be submitted to the electorate at the
general election that immediately precedes the expiration of the
individual's term as a member of the commission. The question
shall be placed on the ballot in the form prescribed by IC 3-11-2
and must state:
"Shall (insert name) be retained as a commissioner of the
Indiana Utility Regulatory Commission for an additional four
(4) year term?".
(g) If a majority of the ballots cast by the electors voting on the
retention of an individual as a member of the commission under
subsection (f) is "yes", the individual begins a new four (4) year
term as a member of the commission upon the expiration of the
term the individual is serving at the time of the election.
(h) If a majority of the ballots cast by the electors voting on the
retention of an individual as a member of the commission under
subsection (f) is "no":
(1) the individual's position on the commission is vacant upon
the expiration of the individual's term; and
(2) the individual may not serve as a member of the
commission following the expiration of the individual's term.
SECTION 6. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1068—LS 6026/DI 119